Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-202
Township organization; petition; filing; election.

(1) In counties not under township organization, a registered voter may file a petition or petitions for the submission of the question of township organization. The petition or petitions shall be signed by registered voters equal in number to five percent of the voters registered in the county at the preceding statewide general election.

(2) The petition or petitions shall be filed in the office of the election commissioner or county clerk by September 1 of the year of the general election at which the petitioners wish to have the question submitted for a vote. If such petition or petitions are filed in conformance with this subsection, the question shall be submitted to the registered voters at the next general election held after the filing of the petition or petitions. The questions on the ballot shall be respectively: For changing to township organization with a seven-member county board of supervisors; or Against changing to township organization.

(3) Elections shall be conducted as provided in the Election Act.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 2, p. 131;

R.S.1913, § 988;

C.S.1922, § 888;

C.S.1929, § 26-202;

R.S.1943, § 23-202;

Laws 2008, LB269, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB434, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 25.

Election Act, see section 32-101.